Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.100

Vocational agriculture education—Superintendent to adopt rules.

The superintendent of public instruction, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 28A.300.090.

[ 1990 c 33 s 254; 1983 1st ex.s. c 34 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.03.419.]